Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2927
Organization of limited cooperative association.

After the effective date of the articles of organization:

(1) If initial directors are named in the articles of organization, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting to appoint officers, adopt initial bylaws, and carry on any other business brought before the meeting; and

(2) If initial directors are not named in the articles of organization, the organizers shall designate the initial directors and call a meeting of them to adopt initial bylaws or carry on any other business necessary and proper to complete the organization of the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 27.